District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.131

Repealed

Establishment of Pedestrian and Bicycle Safety and Enhancement Fund.

Repealed.

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 6021, 55 DCR 7598
Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-269, § 5, 55 DCR 11015
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 9010, 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6032, 62 DCR 10905
This section is referenced in § 50-921.53.
D.C. Law 17-269, in subsec. (a), inserted “In addition, all receipts from fines and penalties collected due to increases in civil fines and new civil infractions established by section 3 of D.C. Law 17-269 shall be deposited into the fund.”.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 substituted “lapsing fund” for “nonlapsing fund” in (a); and rewrote (c)(1).
Section 104 of D.C. Law 17-326 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 104. Health Programs Contingency Fund.
“(a) There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Health Programs Contingency Fund (‘Fund’). All funds deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of the fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available to support unanticipated expenditures within the District Medicaid program and the DC HealthCare Alliance.
“(b) By December 1, 2009, there shall be deposited into the Fund no less than $10 million in local funds.”
Section 201(b) of D.C. Law 17-326 added section 6021a to D.C. Law 17-219 read as follows: “This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 17-326 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 9010 and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 9010 and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 9010 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 6032 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
Short title: Section 6020 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle G of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Pedestrian and Bicycle Safety and Enhancement Fund Establishment Act of 2008”.
D.C. Law 17-269, § 3, referred to in subsec. (a), amended Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations.
Section 9029 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that the amendment by § 9010 of the act shall apply as of September 30, 2014.